Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2274YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 687 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.311C Contracts ââ state moneys 1 or tax credits. 2 A contract for a project that is funded with state moneys 3 or tax credits shall contain a provision requiring that only 4 a product or material manufactured in the United States be 5 purchased for the project if it is possible to do so. 6